District of Columbia statutes.
7-771.06

Department organization.

The Department shall:

(1)

Have a Chief Financial Officer separate from any financial cluster, who shall:

(A)

Be appointed by the Chief Financial Officer of the District of Columbia after consultation with the Director;

(B)

Be qualified by experience and training to carry out accounting, budgeting, and financial management functions;

(C)

Report directly to, be ultimately responsible to, and be under the supervisory direction of the District CFO, through the Director;

(D)

Engage in the accounting, budgeting, and financial management functions as authorized by the District CFO;

(E)

Serve as a member of the Department management team;

(F)

Advocate for and advance the policy objectives of the Director, to the extent consistent with the ultimate responsibility of the Department CFO to, and supervisory control by, the District CFO; and

(G)

Be subject to evaluation, discipline, and transfer by the District CFO, in consultation with the Director;

(2)

Have a general counsel or the equivalent, who shall:

(A)

Be appointed by the Attorney General for the District of Columbia as an employee of the Office of the Attorney General, after consultation with the Director;

(B)

Be an attorney admitted to the practice of law in the District of Columbia;

(C)

Be qualified by experience and training to advise the Department with respect to legal issues related to its powers and duties;

(D)

Be in the Senior Executive Attorney Service as an at-will employee under the direction and control of the Attorney General;

(E)

Be subject to all applicable provisions of subchapter VIII-B of Chapter 6 of Title 1 [§ 1-608.51 et seq.];

(F)

Have an attorney-client relationship with the Department;

(G)

Advocate vigorously for the positions of the Department on legal issues, and if that advocacy poses a conflict with a legal position of the Attorney General, seek exemption from the supervision of the Attorney General as to that position, in accordance with § 1-608.55(b); and

(H)

Be subject to evaluation, discipline, and transfer by the Attorney General, after consultation with the Director; and

(3)

Have sufficient staff, supervisory personnel, and resources, and be organized to carry out the functions and duties set forth in this chapter.

Feb. 27, 2008, D.C. Law 17-109, § 7, 55 DCR 216